Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5200.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406nn. (1) A health insurance policy delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state that provides gynecological coverage must include coverage for at least 1 pap smear performed on a woman 21 years of age or older every 3 calendar years. (2) Coverage under subsection (1) must not be subject to any dollar limit, copayment, deductible, or coinsurance provision that does not apply to screening coverage generally.